glossing/lexicons/verb_rules.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!    Verbs    !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


! Verb-prefixes -%> Tense-pref -%> Verbs -%> V -%> IV%&TV -%> V-aspect -%> V-tense -%>
! -%> Thematic -%> Subj%&Agent ( -%> Object )




LEXICON Verb-prefixes

! Subject%&agent verbal prefixes
@P.VPR.t@1SG%.S%&A%-:@P.VPR.t@т%{ы%}%> V-Tense-Prefixes ;
@P.VPR.myt@1PL%.S%&A%-:@P.VPR.myt@мыт%{ы%}%> V-Tense-Prefixes ;
@P.VPR.m@1SG%.S%&A%.SUBJ%-:@P.VPR.m@м%{ы%}%> V-Tense-Prefixes ;
@P.VPR.myns@1PL%.S%&A%.SUBJ%-:@P.VPR.myns@мын%{ы%}%> V-Tense-Prefixes ;
@P.VPR.myn@1PL%.S%&A%-:@P.VPR.myn@мын%{ы%}%> V-Tense-Prefixes ;
@P.VPR.q@2%.S%&A%.SUBJ%-:@P.VPR.q@ӄ%{ы%}%> V-Tense-Prefixes ;
@P.VPR.n@3%.S%&A%.SUBJ%-:@P.VPR.n@н%{ы%}%> V-Tense-Prefixes ;
@P.VPR.nil@2%&3%.S%&A%-:@P.VPR.nil@ V-Tense-Prefixes ;
!! Transitive
@P.VPR.ne@LOW%.A%-:@P.VPR.ne@н%{Æ%}%> V-Tense-Prefixes ;
@P.VPR.nen@LOW%.A%-:@P.VPR.nen@н%{Æ%}н%> V-Tense-Prefixes ;
@P.VPR.yn@LOW%.A%.SUBJ%-:@P.VPR.yn@ыʼн%> V-Tense-Prefixes ;
! Stative prefixes
@P.VPR.perf@PF%-:@P.VPR.perf@г%{Æ%}%> V-INV ;
@P.VPR.hab@ST%-:@P.VPR.hab@н%{ы%}%> V-INV ;



!!!!!! Tense prefixes (fut, cond)

LEXICON V-Tense-Prefixes

%[%+fut%]FUT%-:р%{Æ%}%> V-INV ;
%[%+cond%]COND%-:ъ%{ы%}%> V-INV ;
: V-INV ;

LEXICON V-INV
%[%+inv2%]INV%-:ин%{Æ%}%> Verbs ;
@P.itsa.verb@:@P.itsa.verb@ V-DERIV-PREFIXES ;
! : Verbs ;
: PRE-VERBS ;
@R.VPR.hab@:@R.VPR.hab@ ADJ ;

LEXICON INTER-V
%+: Verbs "weight: 1.5" ;

! LEXICON V-INTO-TMP
! : Adjectives ;
! : Nouns ;


LEXICON V

%.iv: V-IV ;
%.tv: V-TV ;



!!!!!! Aspect & stative


LEXICON V-IV

! : V-IV-AFFIX ;
! %<v%>%<iv%>: V-IV-AFFIX ;
@U.V.iv@:@U.V.iv@ V-DERIV ;


LEXICON V-IV-AFFIX

: V-IV-NEUT ;
%-IPFV:%>%{ы%}ркы V-IV-PROG ;

@D.VPR@%-INF:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}к # ;
@D.VPR@%-SIM:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}ма # ;
@D.VPR@%-LOC:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}к # ;
@D.VPR@%-TOOL%-EQU:@D.VPR@%>%{и%}н%{Æ%}ӈу # ;
@D.VPR@%-CONC:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}масы # ;
@D.VPR@%-PURP:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}йгут # ;


!!! Stative


! LEXICON V-IV-PERFECT

@R.VPR.perf@%-NP%.1SG:@R.VPR.perf@%>%{I%}гым # ;
@R.VPR.perf@%-NP%.1PL:@R.VPR.perf@%>%{ы%}мури # ;
@R.VPR.perf@%-NP%.2SG:@R.VPR.perf@%>%{I%}гыт # ;
@R.VPR.perf@%-NP%.2PL:@R.VPR.perf@%>%{ы%}тури # ;
@R.VPR.perf@%-PF%.3SG:@R.VPR.perf@%>%{ы%}ԓин # ;
@R.VPR.perf@%-PF%.3SG%-PL:@R.VPR.perf@%>%{ы%}ԓин%{Æ%}т # ;


! LEXICON V-IV-HABITUAL

@R.VPR.hab@%-NP%.1SG:@R.VPR.hab@%>%{I%}гым # ;
@R.VPR.hab@%-NP%.1PL:@R.VPR.hab@%>%{ы%}мури # ;
@R.VPR.hab@%-NP%.2SG:@R.VPR.hab@%>%{I%}гыт # ;
@R.VPR.hab@%-NP%.2PL:@R.VPR.hab@%>%{ы%}тури # ;
@R.VPR.hab@%-ST%.3SG:@R.VPR.hab@%>%{ы%}ӄин # ;
@R.VPR.hab@%-ST%.3SG%-PL:@R.VPR.hab@%>%{ы%}ӄин%{Æ%}т # ;





!!!!!! Subject suffixes

LEXICON V-IV-NEUT

! LEXICON V-IV-NEUT-AOR
@R.VPR.t@%-1SG%.S:@R.VPR.t@%>%{ы%}к # ;   ! +
@R.VPR.myt@%-1PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.myt@%>%{ы%}мык # ;      ! +
@R.VPR.nil@%-2%&3SG%.S:@R.VPR.nil@%>и # ;       ! -
@R.VPR.nil@%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}тык # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%-2%&3SG%.S:@R.VPR.nil@%>и # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%-PL:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}т # ;
! +thematic suff
@R.VPR.t@%-TH%-1SG%.S:@R.VPR.t@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}к # ;     ! +
@R.VPR.nil@%-TH%-2%&3SG%.S:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}гъи # ;    ! -
! @R.VPR.nil@%-TH%-2%&3SG%.S:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}гъи # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%-TH%-PL:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}т # ;


! LEXICON V-IV-NEUT-FUT == будущее, неимперфективный

@R.VPR.t@%[%+fut%]:@R.VPR.t@ы # ;
@R.VPR.myt@%[%+fut%]:@R.VPR.myt@ы # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]:@R.VPR.nil@ы # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]%-FUT%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}ӈытык # ;
! @R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]:@R.VPR.nil@ # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]%-FUT%-PL:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}ӈыт # ;
! +thematic suff
@R.VPR.t@%[%+fut%]%-TH:@R.VPR.t@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%} # ;
@R.VPR.myt@%[%+fut%]%-TH:@R.VPR.myt@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%} # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]%-TH:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%} # ;
! @R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]%-TH:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%} # ;


! LEXICON V-IV-NEUT-INTN == императив, неимперфективный

@R.VPR.m@%-1SG%.S:@R.VPR.m@%>%{ы%}к # ;

@R.VPR.myn@%-1PL%.S:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{ы%}мык # ;

@R.VPR.q@%-IRR%-2%&3SG%.S:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}ги # ;
@R.VPR.q@%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}тык # ;
@R.VPR.n@%-IRR%.2%&3SG%.S:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}н # ;
@R.VPR.n@%-IRR%.2%&3SG%.S%-PL:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%}т # ;
! +thematic suff
@R.VPR.m@%-TH%-1SG.S:@R.VPR.m@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}к # ;
@R.VPR.n@%-TH%-IRR%.2%&3SG%.S:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}н # ;


! LEXICON V-IV-NEUT-COND == кондиционал, неимперфективный

@R.VPR.t@%[%+cond%]%-1SG%.S:@R.VPR.t@%>%{ы%}к # ;
@R.VPR.myn@%[%+cond%]%-1PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{ы%}мык # ;
@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%-IRR%.2%&3SG%.S:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}н # ;
@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}тык # ;
! @R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%<s_sg3%>:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}н # ;
@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%-IRR%.2%&3SG%.S%-PL:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%}т # ;
! +thematic suff
@R.VPR.m@%[%+cond%]%-TH%-1SG%.S:@R.VPR.m@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}к # ;
@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%-TH%-IRR%.2%&3SG%.S:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}н # ;


!! Progressive

LEXICON V-IV-PROG

! LEXICON V-IV-PROG-AOR

@R.VPR.t@%:@R.VPR.t@н # ;
@R.VPR.myt@:@R.VPR.myt@н # ;
@R.VPR.nil@:@R.VPR.nil@н # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.nil@ни%>тык # ;
! @R.VPR.nil@%<aor%>%<s_sg3%>:@R.VPR.nil@н # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%-PL:@R.VPR.nil@т # ;


! LEXICON V-IV-PROG-FUT == будущее имперфективное

@R.VPR.t@%[%+fut%]:@R.VPR.t@н # ;
@R.VPR.myt@%[%+fut%]:@R.VPR.myt@н # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]:@R.VPR.nil@н # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}нитык # ;
! @R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]%<s_sg3%>:@R.VPR.nil@ # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]%-FUT%-PL:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}ниӈыт # ;


! LEXICON V-IV-PROG-INTN == императив имперфективный

@R.VPR.m@:@R.VPR.m@н # ;
@R.VPR.myn@:@R.VPR.myn@н # ;
@R.VPR.q@:@R.VPR.q@н # ;
@R.VPR.q@%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.q@ни%>тык # ;
@R.VPR.n@:@R.VPR.n@н # ;
@R.VPR.n@%-PL:@R.VPR.n@н%{Æ%}%>%т # ;


! LEXICON V-IV-PROG-COND == кондиционал имперфективный

@R.VPR.m@%[%+cond%]:@R.VPR.m@н # ;
@R.VPR.myn@%[%+cond%]:@R.VPR.myn@н # ;
@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]:@R.VPR.n@н # ;
@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.n@ни%>тык # ;
! @R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]:@R.VPR.n@н # ;
@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%-PL:@R.VPR.n@н%{Æ%}%>%т # ;



!!! Transitive

LEXICON V-TV

! : V-TV-AFFIX ;
! %<v%>%<tv%>: V-TV-AFFIX ;
@U.V.tv@:@U.V.tv@ V-DERIV ;


LEXICON V-TV-AFFIX

! : V-TV-ACTIVE ;
! %<stat%>: V-TV-STATIVE ;
! @D.VPR@:@D.VPR@ V-TV-NONFIN ;


! LEXICON V-TV-ACTIVE

: V-TV-NEUT ;
%-IPFV:%>%{ы%}ркыни%{·%} V-TV-PROG ;
%-IPFV%[%+inv%]:%>ткуркыни%{·%} V-TV-PROG ;

@D.VPR@%-INF:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}к # ;
@D.VPR@%-SIM:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}ма # ;
@D.VPR@%-LOC:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}к # ;
@D.VPR@%-TOOL%-EQU:@D.VPR@%>%{и%}н%{Æ%}ӈу # ;
@D.VPR@%-CONC:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}масы # ;
@D.VPR@%-PURP:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}йгут # ;
! LEXICON V-TV-STATIVE

! @R.VPR.perf@%<stat%>%<perf%>:@R.VPR.perf@ V-TV-PERFECT ;
! @R.VPR.hab@%<stat%>%<hab%>:@R.VPR.hab@ V-TV-HABITUAL ;



!!! Stative


!!!!!!! Transitive

! LEXICON V-TV-PERFECT

@R.VPR.perf@%-NP%.2SG%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.perf@%>%{I%}гыт # ;
@R.VPR.perf@%-NP%.2PL%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.perf@%>%{ы%}тури # ;
@R.VPR.perf@%-PF%.3SG%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.perf@%>%{ы%}ԓин # ;
@R.VPR.perf@%-NP%.1SG:@R.VPR.perf@%>%{I%}гым # ;

@R.VPR.perf@%-1PL%.O%-NP%.2SG:@R.VPR.perf@%>%{ы%}тку%>%{I%}гыт # ;
@R.VPR.perf@%-1PL%.O%-NP%.2PL:@R.VPR.perf@%>%{ы%}тку%>%{ы%}тури # ;
@R.VPR.perf@%-NP%.1PL:@R.VPR.perf@%>%{ы%}мури # ;
! @R.VPR.perf@%<stat%>%<perf%>%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl1%>:@R.VPR.perf@%>%{ы%}мури # ;

@R.VPR.perf@%-NP%.2SG:@R.VPR.perf@%>%{I%}гыт # ;

! @R.VPR.perf@%<stat%>%<perf%>%<a_1%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.perf@%>%{I%}гыт # ;
@R.VPR.perf@%-NP%.2PL:@R.VPR.perf@%>%{ы%}тури # ;

@R.VPR.perf@%-PF%.3SG:@R.VPR.perf@%>%{ы%}ԓин # ;

@R.VPR.perf@%-PF%.3SG-PL:@R.VPR.perf@%>%{ы%}ԓинэт # ;


! LEXICON V-TV-HABITUAL

@R.VPR.hab@%-NP%.2SG%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.hab@%>%{I%}гыт # ;
@R.VPR.hab@%-NP%.2PL%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.hab@%>%{ы%}тури # ;
@R.VPR.hab@%-ST.3SG%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.hab@%>%{ы%}ӄин # ;
@R.VPR.hab@%-NP.1SG:@R.VPR.hab@%>%{I%}гым # ;

@R.VPR.hab@%-1PL.O-NP.2SG:@R.VPR.hab@%>%{ы%}ткуйгыт # ;
@R.VPR.hab@%-1PL.O-NP.2PL:@R.VPR.hab@%>%{ы%}ткутури # ;
@R.VPR.hab@%-NP.1PL:@R.VPR.hab@%>%{ы%}мури # ;
! @R.VPR.hab@%<stat%>%<hab%>%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl1%>:@R.VPR.hab@%>%{ы%}мури # ;

@R.VPR.hab@%-NP%.1SG%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.hab@%>%{I%}гым # ;
@R.VPR.hab@%-NP%.1PL%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.hab@%>%{ы%}мури # ;

@R.VPR.hab@%-NP%.2SG:@R.VPR.hab@%>%{I%}гыт # ;
@R.VPR.hab@%-NP%.2PL:@R.VPR.hab@%>%{ы%}тури # ;

@R.VPR.hab@%-NP%.1SG%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.hab@%>%{I%}гым # ;
@R.VPR.hab@%-NP%.1PL%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.hab@%>%{ы%}мури # ;
@R.VPR.hab@%-NP%.2SG%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.hab@%>%{I%}гыт # ;
@R.VPR.hab@%-NP%.2PL%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.hab@%>%{ы%}тури # ;

@R.VPR.hab@%-ST%.3SG%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.hab@%>%{ы%}ӄин # ;
@R.VPR.hab@%-ST%.3SG:@R.VPR.hab@%>%{ы%}ӄин # ;

@R.VPR.hab@%-ST%.3SG%-PL%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.hab@%>%{ы%}ӄин%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.hab@%-ST%.3SG%-PL:@R.VPR.hab@%>%{ы%}ӄин%{Æ%}т # ;


!!! Active

!!!!!! Tense

! LEXICON V-IV-NEUT
!
! %<aor%>: V-IV-NEUT-AOR ;
! %<fut%>%[%+fut%]:%> V-IV-NEUT-FUT ;
! %<intn%>: V-IV-NEUT-INTN ;
! %<cond%>%[%+cond%]:%> V-IV-NEUT-COND ;


! LEXICON V-IV-PROG
!
! %<aor%>: V-IV-PROG-AOR ;
! %<fut%>%[%+fut%]:%> V-IV-PROG-FUT ;
! %<intn%>: V-IV-PROG-INTN ;
! %<cond%>%[%+cond%]:%> V-IV-PROG-COND ;


! LEXICON V-TV-NEUT
!
! %<aor%>: V-TV-NEUT-AOR ;
! %<fut%>%[%+fut%]:%> V-TV-NEUT-FUT ;
! %<intn%>: V-TV-NEUT-INTN ;
! %<cond%>%[%+cond%]:%> V-TV-NEUT-COND ;


! LEXICON V-TV-PROG
!
! %<aor%>: V-TV-PROG-AOR ;
! %<fut%>%[%+fut%]:%> V-TV-PROG-FUT ;
! %<intn%>: V-TV-PROG-INTN ;
! %<cond%>%[%+cond%]:%> V-TV-PROG-COND ;
